Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-268
Action by single and multiple voting
groups.

(MBCA
7.26) (a) If the articles of incorporation or the Nebraska Model Business
Corporation Act provide for voting by a single voting group on a matter, action
on that matter is taken when voted upon by that voting group as provided in
section 21-267.

(b) If the articles of incorporation
or the act provide for voting by two or more voting groups on a matter, action
on that matter is taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups
counted separately as provided in section 21-267. Action may be taken by one
voting group on a matter even though no action is taken by another voting
group entitled to vote on the matter.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 68.
January 1, 2016